Utah statutes.
78A-2-209.   Sheriff to supply court rooms when the county legislative body neglects.

If suitable rooms for holding the district court and for chambers of the judge are not provided in the place appointed for holding court in any county, together with attendants, furniture, lights, and stationery sufficient for the transaction of business, the court or the judge may direct the sheriff to provide rooms, attendants, furniture, fuel, lights, and stationery.  All expenses incurred, certified by the judge to be correct, are a charge against the county and shall be paid out of the county's general fund.

